Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6132
Corporate existence; continuation.

Corporate existence of a mutual insurer reorganizing pursuant to the Mutual Insurance Holding Company Act shall not terminate, but the reorganized stock insurer shall be deemed to be a continuation of the mutual insurer and to have been organized on the date the mutual insurer was originally organized.

Laws 1997, LB 740, § 11.